Florida, session 2026, SB158.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 13 14 Section 1.âParagraph (k) is added to subsection (3) of 15 section 626.2815, Florida Statutes, to read: 16 626.2815âContinuing education requirements.â 17 (3)âEach licensee except a title insurance agent must 18 complete a 4-hour update course every 2 years which is specific 19 to the license held by the licensee. The course must be 20 developed and offered by providers and approved by the 21 department. The content of the course must address all lines of 22 insurance for which examination and licensure are required and 23 include the following subject areas: insurance law updates, 24 ethics for insurance professionals, disciplinary trends and case 25 studies, industry trends, premium discounts, determining 26 suitability of products and services, and other similar 27 insurance-related topics the department determines are relevant 28 to legally and ethically carrying out the responsibilities of 29 the license granted. A licensee who holds multiple insurance 30 licenses must complete an update course that is specific to at 31 least one of the licenses held. Except as otherwise specified, 32 any remaining required hours of continuing education are 33 elective and may consist of any continuing education course 34 approved by the department under this section. 35 (k)âFor a licensee who sells pet insurance, the continuing 36 education required under this section must include 2 hours of 37 continuing education relating to pet insurance during each 38 biennial compliance period. 39 Section 2.âPresent subsections (10) and (11) of section 40 627.71545, Florida Statutes, are redesignated as subsections 41 (11) and (12), respectively, a new subsection (10) is added to 42 that section, and paragraph (e) of subsection (6) of that 43 section is amended, to read: 44 627.71545âPet insurance; noninsurance wellness programs.â 45 (6) 46 (e)âAt the time a pet insurance policy is issued or 47 delivered to a policyholder, the pet insurer shall provide the 48 policyholder with a copy of the Insurer Disclosure of Important 49 Policy Provisions document required under paragraph (d), in at 50 least 12-point type. At such time, the pet insurer shall also 51 include a written disclosure with all of the following: 52 1.âContact information for the Division of Consumer 53 Services of the department, including a link and toll-free 54 telephone number, for consumers to submit inquiries and 55 complaints relating to pet insurance products regulated by the 56 department or office. 57 2.âThe address and customer service telephone number of the 58 pet insurance agent. 59 3.âA summary of the key policy features, written in plain 60 language and on a form adopted by the commission by rule, 61 including, at a minimum, coverage limits and deductibles, 62 waiting periods, exclusions, preexisting condition rules, and 63 whether the policy includes wellness benefits. 64 (10)âEach pet insurer authorized to transact pet insurance 65 under this section shall file with the office by March 1 of each 66 year a report containing all of the following information for 67 the preceding calendar year: 68 (a)âThe number of pet insurance policies issued, renewed, 69 and canceled. 70 (b)âAggregate premium and claims data. 71 (c)âData on policy denials and rescissions, including the 72 reason for each denial or rescission. 73 (d)âInformation on waiting periods, exclusions, and 74 wellness program offerings. 75 (e)âAny other information required by rule of the 76 commission. 77 Section 3.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.